Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB568.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Institution" or "postsecondary education institution" means a university,
college, community college, health technology center, vocational-technical
school, technical institute, technical college, technology center, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(b) "Student experiencing homelessness" or "homeless student":
1. Means an individual enrolled in an institution:
a. Who lacks or is at imminent risk of lacking a fixed, regular, and
adequate nighttime residence; or
b. Who is a minor and whose parent or legal guardian is unable or
unwilling to provide shelter and care; and
2. Includes a homeless individual as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 11302.
As used in this paragraph, "fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence" does not include residence in an institution's on-campus
housing; and
(c) "Student in care" means a student enrolled in an institution, whether part-
time or full-time, and:
(a) The student's family receives state-funded adoption assistance under
KRS 199.555;
(b) The student is currently committed to the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services and placed in a family foster home or placed in
accordance with KRS 605.090(3);
(c) The student is in an independent living program and the placement is
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1486
funded by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(d) The student is an adopted child who was in the permanent legal
custody of and placed for adoption by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services; or
(e) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services was the student's legal
custodian on his or her eighteenth birthday.
(2) (a) In an effort to provide assistance to students experiencing homelessness,
each postsecondary education institution shall designate at least one (1)
staff member to serve as a liaison to assist homeless students enrolled at the
institution.
(b) The liaison designated under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall offer
assistance and resources to any homeless student or student in care enrolled
at the institution. The liaison shall have the following responsibilities:
1. To understand provisions pertaining to the financial aid eligibility of
homeless students, including eligibility as an independent student
under the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, Pub. L. No. 89-329;
2. To identify services and resources that are available to and
appropriate for a homeless student;
3. To assist a homeless student or student in care in applying for and
receiving federal and state financial aid and available services;
4. To track and monitor the graduation rate and retention rate of
homeless students and students in care enrolled at the institution;
5. To report annually to the Council on Postsecondary Education, as
appropriate, the number of homeless students and students in care
enrolled at the institution. The report shall include the number of
students who received assistance or services through the liaison and
the type of service or assistance received by the student. If the
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1486
information is available, the report may describe the outcome for the
student as a result of the services or assistance he or she received
through the liaison;
6. To act as an intermediary between a homeless student or student in
care and the office of financial aid, student support services, and
campus housing services;
7. To connect a homeless student or student in care to a local continuum
of care program;
8. To publish on the institution's website information about the services
and resources available through the institution's liaison, as well as
contact information for local, state, and federal services;
9. To develop a plan to provide access to on-campus housing or to
suitable off-campus housing between academic breaks to homeless
students or students in care enrolled at the institution; and
10. To train the institution's employees to identify students experiencing
homelessness and to refer those students to the liaison. At his or her
discretion, the liaison may provide any additional service he or she
reasonably believes is within the purview of the role of liaison.
(c) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall adopt rules, policies, and
procedures to implement and administer this section. The council rules,
policies, and procedures shall:
1. Provide access to a training program developed by a homeless
advocacy organization;
2. Require a liaison to receive training on an annual basis;
3. Collaborate with the state coordinator for McKinney-Vento Homeless
Education and the contact liaisons designated under 42 U.S.C. sec.
11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) to facilitate the efficient transition of homeless
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1486
students from secondary to postsecondary education and provide
homeless students and students in care information about:
a. Support services, including financial aid, on-campus and off-
campus housing, food and meal plan programs, and counseling
services; and
b. Other resources and any other relevant information to assist
these students; and
4. Issue annual reports about students experiencing homelessness and
students in care enrolled at academic institutions.
(d) After three (3) academic years of data is collected or on any three (3)
academic year rolling basis, if the data submitted to the council indicates
that the number of students experiencing homelessness combined with the
number of students in care exceeds two percent (2%) or more of the student
body of the institution, the institution shall create a position whose primary
function is to carry out the responsibilities of a liaison as described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(e) Each institution that provides on-campus housing for students enrolled at the
institution shall:
1. Grant priority for on-campus housing to students experiencing
homelessness and students in care who are enrolled at the institution,
including but not limited to access to on-campus housing that remains
open during academic breaks, and waive fees for the on-campus
housing during academic breaks;
2. Allow students experiencing homelessness and students in care who
are enrolled part-time at the institution to access on-campus housing;
3. Provide information about the availability of on-campus housing to
students experiencing homelessness and students in care; and
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1486
4. Provide information about the services and assistance offered by the
institution regarding homelessness in financial aid packets and
admission packets and on the institution's website.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 2:26 PM Jacketed